Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 46. Mississippi Railroad Improvements Fund

§ 57-46-1.
Mississippi Railroad Improvements Fund created; use of funds; grant program established; purpose of grants; application for grants.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Railroad Improvements Fund which shall consist of monies from any source designated for deposit into the fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Mississippi Development Authority (MDA) for the purposes authorized in subsection (2) of this section.

Monies in the fund that are derived from the proceeds of general obligation bonds may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements made under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The MDA shall establish a program to make grants from the Mississippi Railroad Improvements Fund to assist in paying a portion of the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, construction, reconstruction, upgrading and improvement of railroad lines and related facilities, including projects necessary to ensure safety and structural integrity of rail lines, rail beds and bridges.

An entity desiring a grant under this section shall submit an application to the MDA which shall include, at a minimum:

A description, including the cost, of the requested assistance;

A description of the purpose for which the assistance is requested; and

Any other information required by the MDA.

The MDA shall have sole discretion in providing grants under this section. The terms of a grant shall be within the discretion of the MDA.

The MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, including the establishing of requirements for matching funds and criteria regarding the evaluation of applications for assistance. The MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation and administration of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 44, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.); Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2019.